Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 12 Regulation of Fire Extinguishers and Suppression Systems

25-12-1.
Compliance with chapter; license requirement.

It is unlawful for any firm to engage in the business of installing, inspecting, recharging, repairing, servicing, or testing of portable fire extinguishers or fire suppression systems, as defined by this chapter, in this state except in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. Each firm engaging in any such business must possess a valid and subsisting license issued by the Commissioner. Such license shall not be required for any firm or governmental entity that engages only in installing, inspecting, recharging, repairing, servicing, or testing of portable fire extinguishers or fire suppression systems owned by the firm and installed on property under the control of said firm. Such firms shall remain subject to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 558, § 1.

25-12-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Engineered fire suppression system” means any fire suppression system having pipe lengths, number of fittings, number and types of nozzles, suppression agent flow rates, and nozzle pressures as determined by calculations derived from the appropriate standards of the National Fire Protection Association, whether those calculations are performed by hand or by a computer program or by other method of calculation. These systems may consist of other components, including, but not limited to, detection devices, alarm devices, and control devices as tested and approved by a nationally recognized testing laboratory and shall be manufacturer listed as compatible with the fire suppression system involved.

“Fire suppression system” means any fire-fighting system employing a suppression agent with the purpose of controlling, suppressing, or extinguishing a fire in a specific hazard. The suppression agent shall be a currently recognized agent or water additive required to control, suppress, or extinguish a fire. The term fire suppression system shall include engineered and preengineered systems as defined in this chapter and shall not include those systems addressed in Chapter 11 of this title.

“Firm” means any business, person, partnership, organization, association, corporation, contractor, subcontractor, or individual.

“License” means the document issued by the Commissioner which authorizes a firm to engage in the business of installation, repair, alteration, recharging, inspection, maintenance, service, or testing of fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers.

“Permit” means the document issued by the Commissioner which authorizes an individual to install, inspect, repair, recharge, service, or test fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers.

“Portable fire extinguisher” means a portable device containing an extinguishing agent that can be expelled under pressure for the purpose of suppressing or extinguishing a fire. The device must be listed by a nationally recognized testing laboratory. The device must bear a manufacturer’s name and serial number. The listings, approvals, and serial numbers may be stamped on the manufacturer’s identification and instruction plate or on a separate plate of the testing laboratory soldered or attached to the extinguisher shell in a permanent manner set forth by the listing or approving organization.

“Preengineered fire suppression system” means any system having predetermined flow rates, nozzle pressures, and quantities of an extinguishing agent. These systems have the specific pipe size, maximum and minimum pipe lengths, flexible hose specifications, number of fittings, and number and types of nozzles prescribed by a nationally recognized testing laboratory. The hazards protected by these systems are specifically limited as to the type and size by the testing laboratory based upon actual fire tests. Limitations on hazards that can be protected by these systems are contained in the manufacturer’s installation manual, which is referenced as part of the listing.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 656, § 1.

25-12-3.
Installation, inspection, servicing, or testing of fire suppression systems.

All fire suppression systems required by the Commissioner’s rules and regulations or by other state or local fire safety rules or regulations must be installed, inspected, repaired, recharged, serviced, or tested only by a firm licensed under the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-4.
Installation, inspection, servicing, or testing of portable fire extinguishers.

All portable fire extinguishers required by the Commissioner’s rules and regulations or by other state or local fire safety rules or regulations must be installed, inspected, repaired, recharged, serviced, or tested only by a firm licensed under the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and Regulations for Installation; Inspection; Recharging, Repairing, Servicing, and Testing of Portable Fire Extinguishers or Fire Suppression Systems, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-23.

25-12-5.
Visual inspection of preengineered fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers by fire chiefs, fire marshals, or fire inspectors.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to fire chiefs, fire marshals, fire inspectors, or insurance company inspectors with regard to the routine visual inspection of preengineered fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-6.
Visual inspection of self-owned fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers; fees not applicable to employees of local government or members of legally organized fire departments.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any firm that engages only in the routine visual inspection of fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers owned by the firm and installed on property under the control of said firm.

The fees required by this chapter shall not apply to employees of federal, state, or local governments or to members of legally organized fire departments while acting in their official capacities.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-7.
License and fee required for firm installing, inspecting, servicing, or testing fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers.

Each firm in the business of installing, altering, inspecting, repairing, recharging, servicing, maintaining, or testing fire suppression systems or in the business of inspecting, repairing, recharging, servicing, maintaining, or testing portable fire extinguishers is required to obtain a license from the Commissioner.
The annual fee for said license shall be as established by the Commissioner by rule or regulation, but such license fee shall not exceed $50.00.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-8.
Permit and fee required for individual installing, inspecting, servicing, or testing; exemption.

Each individual actually performing the installing, inspecting, repairing, recharging, servicing, or testing activities must possess a valid and subsisting permit issued by the Commissioner. The annual fee for said permit shall be as established by the Commissioner by rule or regulation, but such permit fee shall not exceed $75.00. Such permit shall not be required for any individual employed by any firm or governmental entity that engages only in installing, inspecting, recharging, repairing, servicing, or testing of portable fire extinguishers or fire suppression systems owned by the firm and installed on property under the control of said firm. Such individuals shall remain subject to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 558, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-56/HB 1055.

25-12-9.
Period of licenses and permits; failure to renew.

The licenses and permits required by this chapter shall be issued by the Commissioner for each license year beginning January 1 and expiring the following December 31.
The failure to renew a license or permit by December 31 will cause the license or permit to become inoperative.
A license or permit which is inoperative because of the failure to renew it shall be restored upon payment of the applicable fee plus a penalty equal to the applicable fee if said fees are paid within 90 days of expiration.
After 90 days, the firm and the employees thereof must apply for new licenses and permits as required for an initial license or permit.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-10.
Forms of licenses, permits, and applications; information required.

The forms of such licenses and permits and applications and fees therefor shall be prescribed by the Commissioner by rule or regulation, subject to the limitations on fees provided for in Code Sections 25-12-7 and 25-12-8. In addition to such other information and data as the Commissioner determines are appropriate and required for such forms, there shall be included in such forms the following matters:

Each such application shall be sworn to by the applicant or, if a corporation, by an officer thereof;

Each application shall clearly state, in detail as set forth by the Commissioner, the type of activity or activities for which the applicant desires a license or permit to perform;

An application for a permit shall include the name of the licensee employing such permittee, and the permit issued in pursuance of such application shall also set forth the name of such licensee. For persons covered by Code Section 25-12-8, the application and permit shall bear the business name of the person’s employer; and

The license or permit issued by the Commissioner shall clearly state the activity or activities for which the firm or individual has been issued the license or permit to perform. The licensee or permittee shall not perform any activity not noted on the license or permit issued by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-11.
Requirement for issuance of license.

A license may not be issued by the Commissioner until:

The applicant has submitted to the Commissioner evidence of registration as a Georgia corporation;

The Commissioner or a person designated by him has by inspection determined that the applicant possesses the equipment required for the activities the applicant requests to be licensed to perform. If the applicant includes in the request the high-pressure hydrostatic testing of equipment, the applicant must submit a copy of its United States Department of Transportation approval and renewals. If the applicant includes in the request the transfer of Halogenated fire suppression agents, the applicant must submit a copy of the current Underwriter’s Laboratories on-site inspection form for a manufacturer’s represented Halon pumping station. The Commissioner shall give an applicant 60 days to correct any deficiencies discovered by inspection;

The applicant has submitted to the Commissioner proof of a valid comprehensive liability insurance policy purchased from an insurer authorized to do business in Georgia. The coverage must include bodily injury and property damage, products liability, completed operations, and contractual liability. The proof of insurance must also be provided before any license can be renewed. The minimum amount of said coverage shall be $1 million or such other amount as specified by the Commissioner. An insurer which provides such coverage shall notify the Commissioner of any change in coverage; and

The applicant, when filing an application for an examination, pays a nonrefundable filing fee fixed by rule or regulation of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-12.
Requirement for issuance of permit.

No permit may be issued to a person for the first time by the Commissioner until the applicant has submitted a nonrefundable filing fee fixed by rule or regulation of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, the subsection (a) designation was deleted since there was no subsection (b).

25-12-13.
Amended licenses or permits.

Any firm or individual holding a valid license or permit desiring to perform an activity not covered by the current permit may submit an application for an amended license or permit at any time between January 1 and the date established by the Commissioner for filing applications for renewing an annual license or permit.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the requirements for obtaining a license or permit shall apply to applications for an amended license or permit. The Commissioner shall by rule or regulation establish the fee for obtaining an amended license and the fee for an amended permit, but such fees shall not exceed the respective limits set forth in Code Sections 25-12-7 and 25-12-8.

The fees for an amended license or permit shall not apply if the new activity or activities are included in an application for a renewal of the annual license or permit. The application for renewal must be accompanied by the proof of training and other applicable documentation regarding the activity or activities desired to be included on the new annual license or permit.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-14.
Production of license or permit on demand.

Every permittee must have a valid and subsisting permit upon his person at all times while engaging in the installing, inspection, recharging, repairing, servicing, or testing of fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers. Every licensee or permittee must be able to produce a valid license or valid permit, as appropriate, upon demand by the Commissioner or his representatives or by any local authority having jurisdiction for fire protection or prevention or by any person for whom the licensee or permittee solicits to perform any of the activities covered by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-15.
Rules and regulations for standards of fire suppression systems and fire extinguishers.

The Commissioner may adopt rules and regulations setting forth the proper installation, inspection, recharging, repairing, servicing, or testing of fire suppression systems or portable fire extinguishers.
The Commissioner may adopt by rule the applicable standards of the National Fire Protection Association or another nationally recognized organization, if the standards are judged by him to be suitable for the enforcement of this chapter.
All fire suppression systems covered by Code Section 25-12-3 and all portable fire extinguishers covered by Code Section 25-12-4 shall be installed, inspected, recharged, repaired, serviced, or tested in compliance with this chapter and with the Commissioner’s rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and Regulations for Installation; Inspection; Recharging, Repairing, Servicing, and Testing of Portable Fire Extinguishers or Fire Suppressions Systems, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-23.

25-12-16.
Specifications for service tags to be attached to fire extinguishers and fire suppression systems.

The Commissioner shall make and promulgate specifications as to the number, type, size, shape, color, and information and data contained thereon of service tags to be attached to all portable fire extinguishers and fire suppression systems covered by this chapter when they are installed, inspected, recharged, repaired, serviced, or tested.
It shall be unlawful to install, inspect, recharge, repair, service, or test any portable fire extinguisher or fire suppression system without attaching the required tag or tags completed in detail, including the actual month, day, and year the work was performed, or to use a tag not meeting the specifications set forth by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-17.
Violation of chapter by licensee or permittee.

The violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to this chapter or the failure or refusal to comply with any notice or order to correct a violation or any cease and desist order by any person who possesses a license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter or who is required to have a license or permit issued pursuant to this chapter is cause for denial, nonrenewal, revocation, or suspension of such license or permit by the Commissioner after a determination that such person is guilty of such violations. An order of suspension shall state the period of time of such suspension, which period may not be in excess of two years from the date of such order. An order of revocation shall state the period of time of such revocation, which period may not be in excess of five years from the date of such order. Such order shall effect suspension or revocation of all licenses and permits then held by the person, and during such period of time no license or permit shall be issued to such person. During the suspension or revocation of any license or permit, the licensee or permittee whose license or permit has been suspended or revoked shall not engage in or attempt or profess to engage in any transaction or business for which a license or permit is required under this chapter or directly or indirectly own, control, or be employed in any manner by any firm, business, or corporation for which a license or permit under this chapter is required. If, during the period between the beginning of proceedings and the entry of an order of suspension or revocation by the Commissioner, a new license or permit has been issued to the person so charged, the order of suspension or revocation shall operate to suspend or revoke, as the case may be, such new license or permit held by such person.

The department shall not, so long as the revocation or suspension remains in effect, issue any new license or permit for the establishment of any new firm, business, or corporation of any person or applicant that has or will have the same or similar management, ownership, control, employees, permittees, or licensees or will use the same or a similar name as the revoked or suspended firm, business, corporation, person, or applicant.

The Commissioner may deny, nonrenew, suspend, or revoke the license or permit of:

Any person, firm, business, or corporation whose license has been suspended or revoked under this chapter;

Any firm, business, or corporation if any officer, director, stockholder, owner, or person who has a direct or indirect interest in the firm, business, or corporation has had his or her license or permit suspended under this chapter; and

Any person who is or has been an officer, director, stockholder, or owner of a firm, business, or corporation or who has or had a direct or indirect interest in a firm, business, or corporation whose license or permit has been suspended or revoked under this chapter.

In addition to the grounds set forth in this Code section, it is cause for denial, nonrenewal, revocation, or suspension of a license or permit by the Commissioner if he or she determines that the licensee or permittee has:

Rendered inoperative a portable fire extinguisher or preengineered or engineered fire suppression system covered by this chapter, except during such time as the extinguisher or preengineered or engineered system is being inspected, recharged, hydrotested, repaired, altered, added to, maintained, serviced, or tested or except pursuant to court order;

Falsified any record required to be maintained by this chapter or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or current fire codes enforced by the Commissioner;

Improperly installed, recharged, hydrotested, repaired, serviced, modified, altered, inspected, or tested a portable fire extinguisher or preengineered or engineered fire suppression system;

While holding a permit or license, allowed another person to use the permit or license or permit number or license number or used a license or permit or license number or permit number other than his or her own valid license or permit or license number or permit number;

Failed to provide proof of or failed to maintain the minimum comprehensive liability insurance coverage as set forth in paragraph (3) of Code Section 25-12-11;

Failed to obtain, retain, or maintain one or more of the qualifications for a license or permit required by this chapter;

Used credentials, methods, means, or practices to impersonate a representative of the Commissioner or the state fire marshal or any local fire chief, fire marshal, or other fire authority having jurisdiction;

Installed, recharged, hydrotested, repaired, serviced, modified, altered, inspected, maintained, added to, or tested a portable fire extinguisher or preengineered or engineered fire suppression system without a current, valid license or permit when such license or permit is required by this chapter;

Made a material misstatement or misrepresentation or committed a fraud in obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or permit; or

Failed to notify the Commissioner, in writing, within 30 days after a change of residence, principal business address, or name.

In addition, the Commissioner shall not issue a new license or permit if the Commissioner finds that the circumstance or circumstances for which the license or permit was previously suspended or revoked still exist or are likely to recur.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 592, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, a comma was inserted following “revocation” in the first sentence in subsection (a); a comma was deleted following “licensees” in subsection (b); in paragraph (d)(9), a comma was deleted following “misstatement” and “misrepresentation” and “or” was inserted following “misstatement”; and “recur” was substituted for “reoccur” in subsection (e).

25-12-18.
Cease and desist orders; period of revocation; civil penalty; opportunity for hearing; civil actions.

Whenever the Commissioner shall have reason to believe that any individual is or has been violating any provisions of this chapter, the Commissioner, his or her deputy, his or her assistant, or other designated persons may issue and deliver to the individual an order to cease and desist such violation. An order issued under this Code section may be delivered in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section.

Violation of any provision of this chapter or failure to comply with a cease and desist order is cause for revocation of any or all permits and licenses issued by the Commissioner for a period of not less than six months and not to exceed five years. If a new permit or license has been issued to the person so charged, the order of revocation shall operate effectively with respect to such new permits and licenses held by such person. In the case of an applicant for a license, certificate, or permit, violation of any provision of this title may constitute grounds for refusal of the application. Decisions under this subsection may be appealed as provided by law.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Commissioner of not more than $1,000.00 for a first offense, not less than $1,000.00 and not more than $2,000.00 for a second offense, and not less than $2,000.00 or more than $5,000.00 for a third or subsequent offense. Prior to subjecting any person or entity to a fine under this subsection, the Commissioner or his or her agent shall give written notice to the person or entity by hand delivery or by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, of the existence of the violations. After a reasonable period of time after notice is given, an order may be issued based on this Code section. Such order must be delivered in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section and must notify the person or entity of the right to a hearing with respect to same.

Any order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter shall contain or be accompanied by a notice of opportunity for hearing which may provide that a hearing will be held if and only if a person subject to the order requests a hearing within ten days of receipt of the order and notice. The order and notice shall be served by delivery by the Commissioner or his or her agent or by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested. Any person who fails to comply with any order under this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished as provided by law.

In addition to other powers granted to the Commissioner under this chapter, the Commissioner may bring a civil action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 592, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 25; Ga. L. 2014, p. 385, § 3/SB 325.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added the last sentence in subsection (a); added the third sentence in subsection (b); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, inserted “any provision of” near the beginning and deleted “for each day a violation persists after such person is notified of the Commissioner’s intent to impose such penalty and the right to a hearing with respect to same” from the end, and added the last three sentences; inserted “issued by the Commissioner under this chapter” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (d); and added subsection (e).

25-12-19.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person, firm, or corporation which violates any provision of this chapter or any order, rule, or regulation of the Commissioner shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall also constitute a misdemeanor willfully or intentionally to:

Obliterate the serial number on a fire suppression system or portable fire extinguisher for the purposes of falsifying service records;

Improperly install a fire suppression system or improperly recharge, repair, service, or test any such suppression system or any such portable fire extinguisher;

While holding a permit or license, allow another person to use the permit or license or permit number or license number or to use a license or permit or license number or permit number other than his own valid license or permit or license number or permit number;

Use or permit the use of any license by an individual or organization other than the one to whom the license is issued;

To use any credential, method, means, or practice to impersonate a representative of the Commissioner or the state fire marshal or any local fire chief, fire marshal, or other fire authority having jurisdiction; or

To engage in the business of installing, inspecting, recharging, repairing, servicing, or testing portable fire extinguishers or fire suppression systems except in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-20.
Delegation of authority by the Commissioner.

Any authority, power, or duty vested in the Commissioner by any provision of this chapter may be exercised, discharged, or performed by a deputy, assistant, or other designated employee acting in the Commissioner’s name and by his delegated authority.
The Commissioner shall be responsible for the official acts of such persons who act in his name and by his authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-21.
Fees collected; grants and gifts.

All fees collected by the Commissioner for licenses, permits, and related examinations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund of this state in accordance with applicable laws of this state.

The Commissioner is authorized to receive grants or gifts for the administration of this chapter from parties interested in upgrading and improving the quality of fire protection provided by portable fire extinguishers or fire suppression systems.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.

25-12-22.
Power of municipality, county, or state to regulate not limited.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a municipality, a county, or the state to require the submission and approval of plans and specifications or to regulate the quality and character of work performed by contractors through a system of permits, fees, and inspections otherwise authorized by law for the protection of the public health and safety.

No municipality or county shall impose any other requirements on persons licensed or permitted by the Commissioner as set forth in this chapter to prove competency to conduct any activity covered by said license or permit.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-12-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 933, § 1.